Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Chapter 15. Special Services for Persons Who Are Blind

§ 1501.
Register.

The Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living may prepare and maintain a register of persons who are blind in the State. It shall describe their condition, cause of blindness, capacity for education and vocational training, and other pertinent data.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 147

, § 2; amended

1973, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. April 14, 1974;

1981, No. 69

;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 89;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 202.

§ 1502.
Services for persons who are blind.

For the rehabilitation or amelioration of the condition of persons who are blind, the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living may:

Ameliorate the condition of persons who are blind by devising means for their adjustment, care, instruction, and well-being, including the distribution of books, promotion of visits to elders who are blind, and by other expedient and proper means and methods.

Furnish medical examinations, physical restoration, guidance and counseling, vocational training, maintenance and transportation, occupational materials, tools, equipment, and licenses.

Assist persons who are blind in developing home industries and small business enterprises and marketing their products.

Act as an intermediary between persons who are blind and otherwise have a disability and industry for the purpose of arranging industrial homework of a subcontract nature, and pay inherent costs such as workers’ compensation insurance and Social Security taxes.

Contribute to the support of persons who are blind from this State who are receiving instruction or training in schools or institutions outside the State.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 147

, § 2; amended

1973, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. April 14, 1974;

1981, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 90;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 202;

2017, No. 3

, § 66, eff. March 2, 2017.